Arkansas statutes. Title 10 General Assembly
Chapter 3 Committees
10-3-1602. Duties.

The duties of the Joint Interim Oversight Committee on Education Reform shall include, but are not limited to, the following:

Reviewing policy issues regarding the creation and implementation of acceptability systems for the state system of education, including the review of any regulatory changes proposed by the appropriate agencies of the executive branch or any boards or commissions prior to their implementation;

Reviewing policy issues affecting educational reform on or before November 15 of the year preceding a regular session and making recommendations concerning any necessary legislative changes proposed by school districts, cooperatives, institutions of higher education, the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education, the State Board of Education, the Division of Career and Technical Education, the Career Education and Workforce Development Board, the Division of Higher Education, the Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board, the Governor's office, and private institutions;

Providing recommendations regarding use of state and federal funds;

Reviewing and assuring coordination between the school districts, cooperatives, institutions of higher education, the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education, the State Board of Education, the Division of Career and Technical Education, the Career Education and Workforce Development Board, the Division of Higher Education, the Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board, the Governor's office, and private institutions; and

Evaluating innovative education projects and promoting the adoption of successful projects.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment substituted “regular session” for “regularly scheduled legislative session” in (2).

The 2019 amendment in (2) and (4), substituted “Division of Elementary and Secondary Education” for “Department of Education”, “Division of Career and Technical Education” for “Department of Career Education”, “Career Education and Workforce Development Board” for “State Board of Career Education”, and “Division of Higher Education” for “Department of Higher Education”.

A.C.R.C. Notes. References to “this chapter” in subchapters 1-16 may not apply to this subchapter which was enacted subsequently.

Effective Dates. Acts 1995, No. 737, § 16: Mar. 22, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that advanced communications and information technology is having a profound impact on the fields of education and medicine; that the purpose of this act is to coordinate and enhance our state's effort to utilize advanced communications and information technology; and that this act is immediately necessary in order for the committees created by the act to begin their work. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 914, § 35: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly that continuing advances in the field of communications and information technology make it necessary to establish a Department of Information Systems within the Executive Department of Government to better coordinate and utilize such technology; and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this act beyond July 1, 1997, could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1997.”

Acts 1997, No. 1354, § 51: Apr. 14, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act affects the method of selection of alternate members of the Legislative Council and Legislative Joint Auditing Committee and that this act is immediately necessary for proper continuity and efficiency in State government. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 3, § 5: Jan. 19, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that the area of advanced communications and information technology is a rapidly growing and changing area of education; that the facilitation of policy development for advanced communications and information technology is necessary for the advancement of interest of the state; that the effectiveness of this Act is essential to the operation of the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology, and that a delay in the effective date could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provisions of an essential governmental committee. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2001, No. 3, § 4: Jan. 11, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Senate has created a Senate Committee on Information Technology and Legislative Affairs; that a similar committee should be created for the House of Representatives; that this act accomplishes that purpose; and that this act should go into effect as soon as possible in order that bills may be assigned to that committee during this regular session. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2007, No. 751, § 38: July 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act dissolves and transfers the duties of the Executive Chief Information Officer, Chief Information Officer, and Office of Information Technology; and that dissolving the offices at the beginning of the state's fiscal year will result in a more efficient transfer of responsibilities and funds. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, § 153: July 1, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas Building Authority, the Arkansas Science and Technology Authority, the Department of Rural Services, and the Division of Land Surveys of the Arkansas Agriculture Department are inefficiently structured; that this inefficient structuring causes an excessive and unnecessary cost to the taxpayers of the this state; and that this act is essential to alleviating that financial burden. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2015.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 978, § 2; 1999, No. 1163, § 2; 2009, No. 962, § 24; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2212, 2213.

Subchapter 17

— Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology

10-3-1701. Purpose.

The General Assembly finds and declares that it is in the highest public interest to provide appropriate means for the continued development and enhancement of educational opportunities, medical care services, and governmental operations throughout the State of Arkansas through the use of the public telecommunications infrastructure and networks employing advanced communication and information technology. Such technology and applications have strategic value for the economy for the State of Arkansas, will strengthen the state's connection to the national and international information infrastructure, and will enable the state and its citizens access to a statewide public telecommunications and information infrastructure capable of connecting government agencies, connecting all seventy-five (75) counties, providing Arkansas citizens access to government information, and being continuously upgraded through the addition of compatible new technology.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 737, § 1.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1995, No. 737, § 1, was also codified as §25-26-101 [repealed].

10-3-1702. Definitions.

For the purpose of this subchapter:

“Distance learning” means an interactive telecommunications system that:

Utilizes information technology, audio, video, and other appropriate elements and is compatible with other distance learning networks; and

Is used for the purpose of enhancing instructional opportunities in Arkansas public schools, technical colleges, community colleges, and universities, and economic development opportunities in business and industry;

“Governmental entity” means any department, board, bureau, commission, or other agency of the state or any entity created by law to provide services to the state;

“Information technology” means the totality of means employed to collect, classify, process, store, retrieve, evaluate, and disseminate information in voice, video, and data form;

“Infrastructure” means an interlinked system of wires, cables, fiber optics, or other wireline or wireless communications media;

“Medical facilities” means any fully licensed and accredited, publicly or privately funded, medical care providers that furnish either inpatient or outpatient services;

“Network” means an interlinked system of users;

“Public access” means access by the public to public information through the use of information technology;

“Public information” means any information stored, gathered, or generated in electronic or magnetic form by the State of Arkansas or its agencies or instrumentalities included within the information deemed to be public pursuant to the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq., and amendments thereto;

“Public telecommunications” means the facilities used in providing telecommunication services to the public, including, but not limited to, facilities owned and operated by public utilities;

“Telemedicine” means an interactive telecommunications system that:

Utilizes information technology, audio, video, and other appropriate elements and is compatible with other telemedicine networks; and

Is used for the purpose of enhancing the delivery of medical information and health care to medical facilities in rural and urban areas throughout Arkansas; and

“Universal access” means access to the public telecommunications infrastructure or the state's information system by all state governmental entities.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1995, No. 737, § 2, was also codified as §25-26-102 [repealed].

History.

Acts 1995, No. 737, § 2.

10-3-1703. Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology — Membership — Cochairs.

There is created a joint standing committee of the House of Representatives and the Senate to be known as the “Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology”.

This Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology shall function as established by law.

The Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology shall be a select committee of the House and the Senate, whose members shall be chosen as follows:

Seven (7) members of the Senate to consist of the members of the Senate Committee on Technology and Legislative Affairs.

Any vacancy shall be filled according to the Rules of the Senate on seniority; and

Ten (10) members of the House to be selected by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.

(a)One (1) alternate member for each of the House members shall be selected by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.

Vacancies in the House membership on the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology shall be filled by the Speaker of the House of Representatives in accordance with the Rules of the House of Representatives.

In the event a vacancy shall occur on the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology, the vacancy shall be filled in the manner as provided for in this section.

Members appointed to the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology shall serve on the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology in addition to their service on the regular standing, joint, and select committees.

The Chair of the Senate Committee on Technology and Legislative Affairs shall serve as the Senate Cochair of the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall designate one (1) of the House members appointed to the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology to serve as the House Cochair of the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology.

The cochairs of the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology shall preside at alternate meetings of the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology, unless the cochairs shall agree otherwise.

Interim study proposals and resolutions filed with the Legislative Council under the provisions of § 10-3-214 for review and referral to the appropriate germane interim committee of the General Assembly, relating to advanced communications and information technology, shall be referred to the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology.

The Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology shall undertake each study referred to it by members of the General Assembly or by the Legislative Council and shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations in regard to each study request to the General Assembly prior to the convening of the next session of the General Assembly.

The Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology shall review any plan developed or updated by a public instrumentality.

The Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology shall have the power and authority, upon approval of a majority of the members of the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology, to subpoena persons, documents, and records. However, no action of the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology regarding the exercise of the subpoena power shall be taken except upon notice of at least one (1) week to all members of the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology or upon a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the membership of the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology.

The Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology shall cooperate with the Governor, with public secondary and postsecondary institutions of education, with the appropriate administrative agencies of this state, with legislative and administrative agencies and institutions of other states, and with the federal government and others in the planning and development of access to a statewide public telecommunications infrastructure linking institutions, businesses, government agencies, schools, hospitals, libraries, communities, and other public and private entities to the national information infrastructure.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2001, No. 1042, § 8, provided:

“The current Department of Information Systems Steering Committee and the Department of Information Systems Advisory Board are hereby abolished.”

Amendments. The 2007 amendment deleted former (b)(1)(B)(iii)(b), and redesignated the remaining provision accordingly.

The 2009 amendment by No. 248 rewrote (c).

The 2009 amendment by No. 962, in (a), inserted “session or fiscal” following “extended recess of the regular” and inserted “or fiscal” following “convening of the next regular”; and deleted “regular” following “convening of the next” in (b)(1)(B)(ii).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Information Systems” for “Department of Information Systems” in (c).

History.

Acts 1995, No. 737, §§ 3, 5; 1999, No. 3, § 1; 2001, No. 3, § 1; 2001, No. 627, § 5.

10-3-1704. Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology — Members — Duties.

The members of the House of Representatives and the Senate appointed at each regular session of the General Assembly to the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology shall constitute a joint committee of the General Assembly to function during and in the interim between the sine die adjournment or extended recess of the regular session or fiscal session of each General Assembly, until the convening of the next regular session or fiscal session of the General Assembly or reconvening of the current General Assembly, or during an extended recess.

(1)(A)The Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology shall make continuing studies concerning the development of access to a statewide public telecommunications network for distance learning, telemedicine, universal access for governmental entities, and other issues concerning advanced communications and information technology, either initiated by the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology or referred to it by either house of the General Assembly for study, in the interim between sessions of the General Assembly.

In addition, the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology shall exercise leadership in the interim between legislative sessions and shall attempt to coordinate for the various committees of the General Assembly the various activities, studies, and planning activities of the General Assembly which relate to the development of access to a statewide public telecommunications information infrastructure.

The Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology shall exercise appropriate legislative oversight of the operations of the Division of Information Systems.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 737, § 5; 1997, No. 914, § 22; 1997, No. 1354, § 28; 2007, No. 751, § 5; 2009, No. 248, § 3; 2009, No. 962, § 25; 2019, No. 910, § 6062.

10-3-1705. Duties of joint standing committee.

Bills pertaining to the Division of Information Systems, advanced communications and information technology, telemedicine, distance learning, or public information access shall be referred to the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology or the Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology, as appropriate.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 737, § 4; 1997, No. 914, § 23; 2001, No. 3, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 6063.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Information Systems” for “Department of Information Systems”.

10-3-1706. Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology — Meetings.

The Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology shall meet upon call by either or both of the cochairs of the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology, or at such other times as may be provided in the rules of the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology, or upon written call by any seven (7) of its members.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 737, § 6.

10-3-1707. Interim committee meetings — Expenses — Staff.

The per diem and mileage, including reimbursement for expenses for attending out-of-state meetings as provided by law, shall be paid from funds appropriated for per diem, mileage, and expenses of members of the General Assembly for attending interim committee meetings or from other funds provided by law for that purpose.

The Bureau of Legislative Research shall furnish such staff assistance as may be requested by the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology.

All other appropriate state agencies, including, but not limited to, the Division of Information Systems, the Arkansas Economic Development Commission, and public colleges and universities in the State of Arkansas, shall be available to assist the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology on advanced communications and information technology matters as may be requested by the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 62 and 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 62, provided: “Transfer of the Arkansas Science and Technology Authority.

“(a) (1)The Arkansas Science and Technology Authority is transferred to the Arkansas Economic Development Commission by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)For the purposes of this act, the commission is the principal department under Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)The statutory authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, of the authority are transferred to the commission, except as specified in this act.

“(c)The prescribed powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing; promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards; and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudication of the authority are transferred to the executive director of the commission, except as specified in this act.

“(d)The members of the Board of Directors of the Arkansas Science and Technology Authority, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the board except as specified in this act.”

Amendments. The 2015 amendment by Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8 substituted “Arkansas Economic Development Commission” for “Arkansas Science andTechnology Authority” in (c).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Information Systems” for “Department of Information Systems” in (c).

A.C.R.C. Notes. References to “this chapter” in subchapters 1-16 may not apply to this subchapter which was enacted subsequently.

Effective Dates. Acts 2001, No. 3, § 4: Jan. 11, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Senate has created a Senate Committee on Information Technology and Legislative Affairs; that a similar committee should be created for the House of Representatives; that this act accomplishes that purpose; and that this act should go into effect as soon as possible in order that bills may be assigned to that committee during this regular session. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

History.

Acts 1995, No. 737, § 7; 1997, No. 914, § 24; 1997, No. 1354, § 29; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 74; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 74; 2019, No. 910, § 6064.

Subchapter 18

— Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology

10-3-1801. Creation.

There is created the “Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology” of the House of Representatives to be composed of the members of the House on the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 3, § 3.

Subchapter 19

— Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission Oversight Committee

10-3-1901. [Expired.]

A.C.R.C. Notes. Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 127, provided: “Sections of the Arkansas Code amended by this act that expire on or before September 30, 2017, may be removed from the Arkansas Code by the Arkansas Code Revision Commission after their respective expiration date.”

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning the creation of the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission Oversight Committee, expired by its own terms December 31, 2016. The section was derived from Acts 2001, No. 1389, § 1; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 11; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 11.

10-3-1902. [Expired.]

A.C.R.C. Notes. Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 127, provided: “Sections of the Arkansas Code amended by this act that expire on or before September 30, 2017, may be removed from the Arkansas Code by the Arkansas Code Revision Commission after their respective expiration date.”

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning the membership of the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission Oversight Committee, expired by its own terms December 31, 2016. The section was derived from Acts 2001, No. 1389, § 1; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 12; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 12.

10-3-1903. [Expired.]

A.C.R.C. Notes. Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 127, provided: “Sections of the Arkansas Code amended by this act that expire on or before September 30, 2017, may be removed from the Arkansas Code by the Arkansas Code Revision Commission after their respective expiration date.”

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning the duties of the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission Oversight Committee, expired by its own terms December 31, 2016. The section was derived from Acts 2001, No. 1389, § 1; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 13; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 13.

Subchapter 20

— Joint Interim Committee on Health Insurance and Prescription Drugs

10-3-2001 — 10-3-2003. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This subchapter, concerning the Joint Interim Committee on Health Insurance and Prescription Drugs, was repealed by Acts 2007, No. 731, § 1. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

10-3-2001. Acts 2003, No. 1392,§ 1.

10-3-2003. Acts 2003, No. 1392, § 3.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2007, No. 1204, § 3, provided:

“The purpose of this act is to strengthen and preserve the integrity of the Continuing Adequacy Evaluation Act of 2004, Arkansas Code §10-3-2101 et seq., by further defining its provisions to ensure that future assessments, evaluations, and monitoring of the state's public education system by the General Assembly will continue to be conducted in a thorough, well-informed and meaningful manner.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.